si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3825 Y 1
SFX 3825 0 ිමල් .
SFX 2592 Y 1
SFX 2592 0 ට්ස් .
SFX 2675 Y 1
SFX 2675 0 ්නටද .
SFX 660 Y 1
SFX 660 0 වන්හි .
SFX 4200 Y 1
SFX 4200 0 වේදීන්ට .
SFX 1198 Y 1
SFX 1198 0 නයකින් .
SFX 779 Y 1
SFX 779 0 ාර්ථ .
SFX 2481 Y 1
SFX 2481 0 බලය .
SFX 1713 Y 1
SFX 1713 0 මාර්ග .
SFX 1243 Y 1
SFX 1243 0 ේවත් .
SFX 3423 Y 1
SFX 3423 0 කෑම් .
SFX 3689 Y 1
SFX 3689 0 ුම්පත් .
SFX 2480 Y 1
SFX 2480 0 බලා .
SFX 3049 Y 1
SFX 3049 0 වාදින්ගෙන් .
SFX 3201 Y 1
SFX 3201 0 මීටර .
SFX 1446 Y 1
SFX 1446 0 වේදියකු .
SFX 4984 Y 1
SFX 4984 0 ගතය .
SFX 4604 Y 1
SFX 4604 0 බිමෙන් .
SFX 987 Y 1
SFX 987 0 යොත් .
SFX 925 Y 1
SFX 925 0 ගතව .
SFX 113 Y 1
SFX 113 0 ගත් .
SFX 1539 Y 1
SFX 1539 0 ගමුව .
SFX 4979 Y 1
SFX 4979 0 ගති .
SFX 1483 Y 1
SFX 1483 0 යකගේ .
SFX 2128 Y 1
SFX 2128 0 කුගෙන් .
SFX 3460 Y 1
SFX 3460 0 ඕවිට .
SFX 921 Y 1
SFX 921 0 ණන් .
SFX 3859 Y 1
SFX 3859 0 ිතාව .
SFX 1392 Y 1
SFX 1392 0 ුමක .
SFX 4916 Y 1
SFX 4916 0 ඥයෙක් .
SFX 721 Y 1
SFX 721 0 ුමට .
SFX 4918 Y 1
SFX 4918 0 ඥයෙකි .
SFX 4917 Y 1
SFX 4917 0 ඥයෙකු .
SFX 2211 Y 1
SFX 2211 0 ුමය .
SFX 4635 Y 1
SFX 4635 0 පාලනයේ .
SFX 221 Y 1
SFX 221 0 ුම් .
SFX 4991 Y 1
SFX 4991 0 ක්කාරයෝ .
SFX 3953 Y 1
SFX 3953 0 ාවේද .
SFX 1028 Y 1
SFX 1028 0 ුමේ .
SFX 2584 Y 1
SFX 2584 0 ණාට .
SFX 4889 Y 1
SFX 4889 0 ණාද .
SFX 3370 Y 1
SFX 3370 0 ණාම .
SFX 3153 Y 1
SFX 3153 0 රයත් .
SFX 3576 Y 1
SFX 3576 0 ොල් .
SFX 3383 Y 1
SFX 3383 0 චාරයෙන් .
SFX 906 Y 1
SFX 906 0 යෙකුගේ .
SFX 4473 Y 1
SFX 4473 0 යීම .
SFX 851 Y 1
SFX 851 0 යීය .
SFX 725 Y 1
SFX 725 0 ියන්ගේ .
SFX 2865 Y 1
SFX 2865 0 ැස්ම .
SFX 1743 Y 1
SFX 1743 0 නයයි .
SFX 3905 Y 1
SFX 3905 0 ැස්ස .
SFX 74 Y 1
SFX 74 0 යෙහි .
SFX 3437 Y 1
SFX 3437 0 කවලට .
SFX 3903 Y 1
SFX 3903 0 ෑන් .
SFX 4669 Y 1
SFX 4669 0 පතියා .
SFX 1698 Y 1
SFX 1698 0 රයෙක් .
SFX 2002 Y 1
SFX 2002 0 රයෙකු .
SFX 1926 Y 1
SFX 1926 0 ාංශය .
SFX 4986 Y 1
SFX 4986 0 ක්ෂා .
SFX 928 Y 1
SFX 928 0 කයෙක් .
SFX 2911 Y 1
SFX 2911 0 ායතනය .
SFX 3447 Y 1
SFX 3447 0 කයෙකි .
SFX 1552 Y 1
SFX 1552 0 කයෙකු .
SFX 2752 Y 1
SFX 2752 0 ුම්කරුගේ .
SFX 3011 Y 1
SFX 3011 0 ශාන්ත .
SFX 4047 Y 1
SFX 4047 0 ාගාරයෙහි .
SFX 2331 Y 1
SFX 2331 0 සෙමින් .
SFX 2104 Y 1
SFX 2104 0 ඥයන්ගේ .
SFX 4750 Y 1
SFX 4750 0 ධිකාරි .
SFX 4749 Y 1
SFX 4749 0 ධිකාරී .
SFX 433 Y 1
SFX 433 0 කුට .
SFX 2017 Y 1
SFX 2017 0 යාවත් .
SFX 3418 Y 1
SFX 3418 0 කුම .
SFX 3416 Y 1
SFX 3416 0 කුල .
SFX 3334 Y 1
SFX 3334 0 දහසකට .
SFX 2944 Y 1
SFX 2944 0 ාකාරය .
SFX 3641 Y 1
SFX 3641 0 ෙකදී .
SFX 4213 Y 1
SFX 4213 0 වෙගොඩ .
SFX 4053 Y 1
SFX 4053 0 ාකාරව .
SFX 1750 Y 1
SFX 1750 0 දහසක් .
SFX 2941 Y 1
SFX 2941 0 ාකාරී .
SFX 2419 Y 1
SFX 2419 0 රුවක් .
SFX 4415 Y 1
SFX 4415 0 රුවකු .
SFX 3708 Y 1
SFX 3708 0 ුනක් .
SFX 3709 Y 1
SFX 3709 0 ුනකි .
SFX 164 Y 1
SFX 164 0 වරයා .
SFX 2497 Y 1
SFX 2497 0 පනය .
SFX 2646 Y 1
SFX 2646 0 ්වෙමින් .
SFX 4957 Y 1
SFX 4957 0 ගාරයක .
SFX 1448 Y 1
SFX 1448 0 වෙන්නට .
SFX 4941 Y 1
SFX 4941 0 ගොව්වා .
SFX 2607 Y 1
SFX 2607 0 ගාරයට .
SFX 886 Y 1
SFX 886 0 ායක .
SFX 3991 Y 1
SFX 3991 0 ායට .
SFX 996 Y 1
SFX 996 0 පන් .
SFX 1351 Y 1
SFX 1351 0 තාවයෙන් .
SFX 827 Y 1
SFX 827 0 ිවන .
SFX 2795 Y 1
SFX 2795 0 ිවම .
SFX 3779 Y 1
SFX 3779 0 ිවය .
SFX 773 Y 1
SFX 773 0 ිවල .
SFX 2985 Y 1
SFX 2985 0 සිදු .
SFX 1447 Y 1
SFX 1447 0 වෙන්නෙ .
SFX 482 Y 1
SFX 482 0 වෙන්නේ .
SFX 2834 Y 1
SFX 2834 0 ිතයන් .
SFX 2606 Y 1
SFX 2606 0 ගාරයේ .
SFX 832 Y 1
SFX 832 0 ායි .
SFX 1643 Y 1
SFX 1643 0 ායේ .
SFX 3777 Y 1
SFX 3777 0 ිවා .
SFX 1141 Y 1
SFX 1141 0 ිවී .
SFX 1263 Y 1
SFX 1263 0 ිවූ .
SFX 1873 Y 1
SFX 1873 0 ිවේ .
SFX 562 Y 1
SFX 562 0 වුණ .
SFX 4222 Y 1
SFX 4222 0 වුන .
SFX 4220 Y 1
SFX 4220 0 වුම .
SFX 2083 Y 1
SFX 2083 0 තැන .
SFX 2493 Y 1
SFX 2493 0 පාට .
SFX 2492 Y 1
SFX 2492 0 පාත .
SFX 3243 Y 1
SFX 3243 0 පාද .
SFX 2038 Y 1
SFX 2038 0 පාන .
SFX 1451 Y 1
SFX 1451 0 වුව .
SFX 2036 Y 1
SFX 2036 0 පාර .
SFX 455 Y 1
SFX 455 0 පාල .
SFX 3742 Y 1
SFX 3742 0 ීමෙන්ද .
SFX 3465 Y 1
SFX 3465 0 ්සියට .
SFX 528 Y 1
SFX 528 0 ේට .
SFX 3597 Y 1
SFX 3597 0 ේත .
SFX 1809 Y 1
SFX 1809 0 ්තක් .
SFX 166 Y 1
SFX 166 0 ේද .
SFX 3590 Y 1
SFX 3590 0 ේන .
SFX 3545 Y 1
SFX 3545 0 ්තකි .
SFX 133 Y 1
SFX 133 0 ේම .
SFX 132 Y 1
SFX 132 0 ේය .
SFX 1264 Y 1
SFX 1264 0 ිවීම .
SFX 2614 Y 1
SFX 2614 0 ක්කාර .
SFX 1379 Y 1
SFX 1379 0 ්නෙකුට .
SFX 3585 Y 1
SFX 3585 0 ේෂ .
SFX 818 Y 1
SFX 818 0 ේ් .
SFX 2514 Y 1
SFX 2514 0 නෙහි .
SFX 4839 Y 1
SFX 4839 0 තුනක් .
SFX 337 Y 1
SFX 337 0 වාදය .
SFX 1939 Y 1
SFX 1939 0 සහගත .
SFX 3196 Y 1
SFX 3196 0 මෙහිලා .
SFX 584 Y 1
SFX 584 0 වාදි .
SFX 197 Y 1
SFX 197 0 වාදී .
SFX 3259 Y 1
SFX 3259 0 න්විත .
SFX 4683 Y 1
SFX 4683 0 න්විය .
SFX 1573 Y 1
SFX 1573 0 ්නාට .
SFX 1803 Y 1
SFX 1803 0 ්නාහ .
SFX 3188 Y 1
SFX 3188 0 යකගෙන් .
SFX 3246 Y 1
SFX 3246 0 පනයක් .
SFX 1371 Y 1
SFX 1371 0 කයනට .
SFX 408 Y 1
SFX 408 0 කරුවන්ට .
SFX 3685 Y 1
SFX 3685 0 ුම්වලදී .
SFX 382 Y 1
SFX 382 0 කයන් .
SFX 1981 Y 1
SFX 1981 0 වගෙන් .
SFX 4977 Y 1
SFX 4977 0 ගතිය .
SFX 1084 Y 1
SFX 1084 0 යිනට .
SFX 104 Y 1
SFX 104 0 යින් .
SFX 3170 Y 1
SFX 3170 0 යිනි .
SFX 1370 Y 1
SFX 1370 0 කයාට .
SFX 3169 Y 1
SFX 3169 0 යිනේ .
SFX 2926 Y 1
SFX 2926 0 ානයක .
SFX 2925 Y 1
SFX 2925 0 ානයට .
SFX 1670 Y 1
SFX 1670 0 වාක් .
SFX 1481 Y 1
SFX 1481 0 යෝද .
SFX 2434 Y 1
SFX 2434 0 යෝය .
SFX 4168 Y 1
SFX 4168 0 සලට .
SFX 2923 Y 1
SFX 2923 0 ානයේ .
SFX 2867 Y 1
SFX 2867 0 ැසුම .
SFX 4971 Y 1
SFX 4971 0 ගන්ට .
SFX 1540 Y 1
SFX 1540 0 ගන්ඩ .
SFX 1442 Y 1
SFX 1442 0 සල් .
SFX 2993 Y 1
SFX 2993 0 සලා .
SFX 268 Y 1
SFX 268 0 ගන්න .
SFX 3872 Y 1
SFX 3872 0 ිටත් .
SFX 4924 Y 1
SFX 4924 0 ජිකයන් .
SFX 2648 Y 1
SFX 2648 0 ්වෙනවා .
SFX 3999 Y 1
SFX 3999 0 ාමක් .
SFX 4862 Y 1
SFX 4862 0 තයෙහි .
SFX 4014 Y 1
SFX 4014 0 ාධිපතිවරුන් .
SFX 2047 Y 1
SFX 2047 0 නොත් .
SFX 3225 Y 1
SFX 3225 0 බැස .
SFX 4958 Y 1
SFX 4958 0 ගාමීන් .
SFX 1764 Y 1
SFX 1764 0 ණහොත් .
SFX 4809 Y 1
SFX 4809 0 දමින් .
SFX 2765 Y 1
SFX 2765 0 ුණේත් .
SFX 3887 Y 1
SFX 3887 0 ිකරණයේ .
SFX 1711 Y 1
SFX 1711 0 මුවා .
SFX 4766 Y 1
SFX 4766 0 දේහය .
SFX 4241 Y 1
SFX 4241 0 විටෙක .
SFX 4074 Y 1
SFX 4074 0 හුම් .
SFX 110 Y 1
SFX 110 0 ්වලට .
SFX 2654 Y 1
SFX 2654 0 ්වලද .
SFX 1547 Y 1
SFX 1547 0 කරවන .
SFX 609 Y 1
SFX 609 0 ම්වලට .
SFX 2636 Y 1
SFX 2636 0 කර්මයක් .
SFX 2144 Y 1
SFX 2144 0 කමයි .
SFX 2137 Y 1
SFX 2137 0 කරවා .
SFX 3480 Y 1
SFX 3480 0 ්වලා .
SFX 571 Y 1
SFX 571 0 නයෙන් .
SFX 3261 Y 1
SFX 3261 0 න්වන .
SFX 1729 Y 1
SFX 1729 0 න්වල .
SFX 3258 Y 1
SFX 3258 0 න්වේ .
SFX 453 Y 1
SFX 453 0 යැයි .
SFX 2469 Y 1
SFX 2469 0 මඩු .
SFX 3973 Y 1
SFX 3973 0 ාලයෙන් .
SFX 3630 Y 1
SFX 3630 0 ෙණු .
SFX 3595 Y 1
SFX 3595 0 ේදිම .
SFX 3883 Y 1
SFX 3883 0 ිකරුවෝ .
SFX 4370 Y 1
SFX 4370 0 ලුණු .
SFX 1826 Y 1
SFX 1826 0 ේන් .
SFX 2086 Y 1
SFX 2086 0 තාවයකට .
SFX 262 Y 1
SFX 262 0 ්නන් .
SFX 612 Y 1
SFX 612 0 තාවයක් .
SFX 4339 Y 1
SFX 4339 0 වත්කම .
SFX 3211 Y 1
SFX 3211 0 මහත් .
SFX 2664 Y 1
SFX 2664 0 ්‍යතාව .
SFX 1195 Y 1
SFX 1195 0 නින් .
SFX 1769 Y 1
SFX 1769 0 ටට .
SFX 787 Y 1
SFX 787 0 වංශ .
SFX 4351 Y 1
SFX 4351 0 වංස .
SFX 3345 Y 1
SFX 3345 0 තේද .
SFX 100 Y 1
SFX 100 0 ටද .
SFX 4830 Y 1
SFX 4830 0 තේම .
SFX 1103 Y 1
SFX 1103 0 තේය .
SFX 77 Y 1
SFX 77 0 ටම .
SFX 234 Y 1
SFX 234 0 ටය .
SFX 4300 Y 1
SFX 4300 0 වරෙන් .
SFX 3050 Y 1
SFX 3050 0 වාටත් .
SFX 287 Y 1
SFX 287 0 ට් .
SFX 4745 Y 1
SFX 4745 0 නත්වය .
SFX 1531 Y 1
SFX 1531 0 ටා .
SFX 754 Y 1
SFX 754 0 ටි .
SFX 862 Y 1
SFX 862 0 ටු .
SFX 4905 Y 1
SFX 4905 0 ටේ .
SFX 1735 Y 1
SFX 1735 0 නුවන් .
SFX 1768 Y 1
SFX 1768 0 ටෝ .
SFX 2221 Y 1
SFX 2221 0 ීයාම .
SFX 4618 Y 1
SFX 4618 0 ප්‍රාප්ත .
SFX 2106 Y 1
SFX 2106 0 ච්චි .
SFX 2887 Y 1
SFX 2887 0 ාසන .
SFX 2886 Y 1
SFX 2886 0 ාසය .
SFX 3968 Y 1
SFX 3968 0 ාවකදී .
SFX 2883 Y 1
SFX 2883 0 ාස් .
SFX 3947 Y 1
SFX 3947 0 ාසි .
SFX 3946 Y 1
SFX 3946 0 ාසී .
SFX 3273 Y 1
SFX 3273 0 න්තයි .
SFX 4070 Y 1
SFX 4070 0 ළා .
SFX 3272 Y 1
SFX 3272 0 න්තයේ .
SFX 4352 Y 1
SFX 4352 0 ල්ස් .
SFX 1431 Y 1
SFX 1431 0 ළි .
SFX 4065 Y 1
SFX 4065 0 ළී .
SFX 582 Y 1
SFX 582 0 ළු .
SFX 1740 Y 1
SFX 1740 0 නික .
SFX 4058 Y 1
SFX 4058 0 ළෙ .
SFX 2947 Y 1
SFX 2947 0 ළේ .
SFX 1382 Y 1
SFX 1382 0 ේගම .
SFX 1514 Y 1
SFX 1514 0 දීමෙන් .
SFX 468 Y 1
SFX 468 0 නිය .
